New York, session 2025-2026, S7377.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 7.49 to read as follows: 3 § 7.49 Mental health clubhouses. 4 (a) Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the term "mental 5 health clubhouse" or "clubhouse" means a facility that: 6 1. is accredited or is in the process of becoming accredited, by a 7 recognized body or bodies approved by the office; 8 2. addresses psychosocial deficits and social determinants of health; 9 3. uses a therapeutic approach that emphasizes purposeful engagement, 10 relationship development, and mutual support for people with serious 11 mental illness; 12 4. has members and program staff work side by side to build and manage 13 a non-clinical therapeutic community; 14 5. offers members a community-based rehabilitative environment that 15 both addresses psychosocial needs of people living with serious mental 16 illness and provides structures that offer support in natural, community 17 environments; 18 6. offers support services for employment, education, health care, 19 housing, and other services to broadly address health-related social 20 care needs; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08603-09-5 S. 7377--B 2 1 7. is an essential part of the continuum of care and works in tandem 2 with other medical and behavioral health services; 3 8. relies on the restorative power of work and work-mediated relation- 4 ships to build a firm foundation for growth and individual achievement 5 for members; 6 9. emphasizes strengths-based teamwork and opportunities to contribute 7 to operations through a work-ordered day; and 8 10. offers social and community-based recreational opportunities to 9 contribute to a member's path and success in recovery. 10 (b) Mental health clubhouses; establishment. 1. Clubhouses shall be 11 established within reasonable proximity to public transportation, if 12 practicable. If feasible and within available resources, virtual club- 13 house programming shall be implemented by an accredited clubhouse to 14 ensure accessibility to clubhouse support services in rural areas or 15 other parts of the state without access to a physical clubhouse. 16 2. The office shall develop a statewide implementation plan through 17 technical advising and consultation with established clubhouses to 18 assist with the accreditation process for any clubhouse in the state and 19 with implementation of the provisions under this section within one year 20 of the effective date of this article. 21 (c) Operational standards and core services. Membership of clubhouses 22 shall be: 23 1. voluntary, free of cost, and open to any individual with a history 24 of serious mental illness; and 25 2. shall receive accreditation or be in the process of becoming 26 accredited within the first three years of operation by a recognized 27 body. 28 (d) Oversight, compliance, and reporting. 1. Each clubhouse shall 29 submit a comprehensive report every two years to the office detailing: 30 (i) clubhouse active membership statistics and daily service utiliza- 31 tion; 32 (ii) employment placements and workforce development outcomes; 33 (iii) housing placements and homelessness prevention efforts; and 34 (iv) crisis intervention cases and emergency responses. 35 2. The office shall conduct biennial audits of all clubhouses to 36 ensure compliance with regulations promulgated by the office consistent 37 with this section and shall be research-based, utilizing information 38 from sources with expertise in the operation and the accreditation of a 39 clubhouse. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 41 have become a law.